District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-778

Washington Asylum Hospital continued.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1922, 42 Stat. 702, ch. 249, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48,§ 12(h), 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-108.
1973 Ed., § 32-307.